New York, session 2025-2026, A10937.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 3.09 of the parks, recreation and historic preser- 2 vation law is amended by adding a new subdivision 25 to read as follows: 3 25. Permit composting facilities at state parks when such composting 4 facility does not harm the natural environment or integrity of the park 5 and provided that such facilities shall comply with codes, rules and 6 regulations relating to composting facilities. 7 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD10922-03-6